Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-1278
Nebraska Investment Council; comprehensive review of council; contract.

The Nebraska Investment Council shall enter into a contract with a qualified independent organization familiar with similar state investment offices to complete a comprehensive review of the current statutory, regulatory, and organizational situation of the council, review best practices of similar state investment offices, and make recommendations to the council, the Governor, and the Legislature for changes needed to ensure that the council has adequate authority to independently execute its fiduciary responsibilities to the members and beneficiaries of the retirement systems, the achieving a better life experience program pursuant to sections 77-1401 to 77-1409, and the Nebraska educational savings plan trust and the residents of Nebraska with regards to other state funds. The recommendations submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2008, LB1147, § 18;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 131;

Laws 2019, LB33, § 3.